Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.200

Morrill act funds allotted to university.

All funds granted by the United States government under the Morrill act, passed by congress and approved July 2, 1892 [1862], together with all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, for the support and in aid of colleges of agriculture and mechanic arts, as well as experiment stations and farms and extension work in agriculture and home economics in connection with colleges of agriculture and mechanic arts are hereby allotted to Washington State University.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.200. Prior: 1917 c 11 s 2; RRS s 4584. Formerly RCW 28.80.180.]